Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8608
Violation of act; void contract.

A contract entered into with a residential contractor is void if the residential contractor violates any provision of the Insured Homeowners Protection Act.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 35.